utilities/dictionaries/ga_GA-Irish.aff
SFX A Y 83
SFX A   im    nn          [^ui]aim
SFX A   0     id          [^ui]aim
SFX A   im    dh          [^ui]aim
SFX A   aim   faidh       [^uif]aim
SFX A   aim   faimid      [^uif]aim
SFX A   aim   far         [^uif]aim
SFX A   m     gí          [^ui]aim
SFX A   0     is          [^ui]aim
SFX A   m     dís         [^ui]aim
SFX A   aim   tar         [^heuti]aim
SFX A   m     dh          faim
SFX A   im    r           faim
SFX A   im    r           taim
SFX A   aim   tar         bhaim
SFX A   aim   tar         chaim
SFX A   aim   tar         dhaim
SFX A   aim   tar         ghaim
SFX A   aim   tar         mhaim
SFX A   thaim tar         thaim
SFX A   im    nn          [oáóú]im
SFX A   0     id          [oáóú]im
SFX A   m     tear        [oáóú]im
SFX A   im    dh          [oáóú]im
SFX A   im    faidh       [oáóú]im
SFX A   im    faimid      [oáóú]im
SFX A   im    far         [oáóú]im
SFX A   m     gí          [oáóú]im
SFX A   m     dís         [oáóú]im
SFX A   0     is          [oáóú]im
SFX A   im    nn          [iu]aim
SFX A   0     id          [iu]aim
SFX A   m     tear        [iu]aim
SFX A   im    dh          [iu]aim
SFX A   im    faidh       [iu]aim
SFX A   im    faimid      [iu]aim
SFX A   im    far         [iu]aim
SFX A   m     gí          [iu]aim
SFX A   0     is          [iu]aim
SFX A   m     dís         [iu]aim
SFX A   aim   itear       eaim
SFX A   im    eann        [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   0     id          [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   im    eadh        [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   im    fidh        [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   im    fimid       [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   im    fear        [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   m     gí          [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   0     is          [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   m     dís         [^aoáéóú]im
SFX A   im    tear        [^haoáéóút]im
SFX A   im    ear         tim
SFX A   im    tear        bhim
SFX A   im    tear        chim
SFX A   im    tear        dhim
SFX A   thim  tear        thim
SFX A   im    ann         éim
SFX A   0     id          éim
SFX A   m     tear        éim
SFX A   im    adh         éim
SFX A   m     fidh        éim
SFX A   m     fimid       éim
SFX A   m     fear        éim
SFX A   m     gí          éim
SFX A   0     is          éim
SFX A   m     dís         éim
SFX A   m     onn         ím
SFX A   m     mid         ím
SFX A   m     odh         ím
SFX A   m     fidh        ím
SFX A   m     fimid       ím
SFX A   m     fear        ím
SFX A   m     gí          ím
SFX A   0     is          ím
SFX A   m     dís         ím
SFX A   ím    itear       [^aou]ím
SFX A   m     tear        aím
SFX A   ím    itear       [^l]oím
SFX A   m     tear        loím
SFX A   ím    itear       [^hb]uím
SFX A   m     tear        buím
SFX A   ím    itear       ghuím
SFX A   ím    itear       shuím
SFX A   m     tear        bhuím

SFX E Y 120
SFX E   inn   mar         [^iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   dh          [^iu]ainn
SFX E   nn    mis         [^iu]ainn
SFX E   nn    dís         [^iu]ainn
SFX E   ainn  fainn       [^iuf]ainn
SFX E   ainn  fá          [^iuf]ainn
SFX E   ainn  fadh        [^iuf]ainn
SFX E   ainn  faimis      [^iuf]ainn
SFX E   ainn  faidís      [^iuf]ainn
SFX E   ainn  faí         [^iuf]ainn
SFX E   inn   dar         [^iu]ainn
SFX E   ainn  tá          [^heuti]ainn
SFX E   ainn  taí         [^heuti]ainn
SFX E   ainn  á           [ft]ainn
SFX E   inn   í           [ft]ainn
SFX E   ainn  tá          bhainn
SFX E   ainn  taí         bhainn
SFX E   ainn  tá          chainn
SFX E   ainn  taí         chainn
SFX E   ainn  tá          dhainn
SFX E   ainn  taí         dhainn
SFX E   ainn  tá          ghainn
SFX E   ainn  taí         ghainn
SFX E   ainn  tá          mhainn
SFX E   ainn  taí         mhainn
SFX E   thainn tá          thainn
SFX E   thainn taí         thainn
SFX E   inn   mar         [oáóú]inn
SFX E   nn    teá         [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   dh          [oáóú]inn
SFX E   nn    mis         [oáóú]inn
SFX E   nn    dís         [oáóú]inn
SFX E   nn    tí          [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   fainn       [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   fá          [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   fadh        [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   faimis      [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   faidís      [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   faí         [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   dar         [oáóú]inn
SFX E   inn   mar         [iu]ainn
SFX E   nn    teá         [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   dh          [iu]ainn
SFX E   nn    mis         [iu]ainn
SFX E   nn    dís         [iu]ainn
SFX E   nn    tí          [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   fainn       [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   fá          [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   fadh        [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   faimis      [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   faidís      [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   faí         [iu]ainn
SFX E   inn   dar         [iu]ainn
SFX E   ainn  iteá        eainn
SFX E   ainn  ití         eainn
SFX E   inn   eamar       [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   eadh        [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   nn    mis         [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   nn    dís         [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   finn        [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   feá         [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   feadh       [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   fimis       [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   fidís       [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   fí          [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   eadar       [^aoáéóú]inn
SFX E   inn   teá         [^haoáéóút]inn
SFX E   inn   tí          [^haoáéóút]inn
SFX E   inn   eá          tinn
SFX E   inn   í           tinn
SFX E   inn   teá         bhinn
SFX E   inn   tí          bhinn
SFX E   inn   teá         chinn
SFX E   inn   tí          chinn
SFX E   inn   teá         dhinn
SFX E   inn   tí          dhinn
SFX E   thinn teá         thinn
SFX E   thinn tí          thinn
SFX E   inn   amar        éinn
SFX E   nn    teá         éinn
SFX E   inn   adh         éinn
SFX E   nn    mis         éinn
SFX E   nn    dís         éinn
SFX E   nn    tí          éinn
SFX E   nn    finn        éinn
SFX E   nn    feá         éinn
SFX E   nn    feadh       éinn
SFX E   nn    fimis       éinn
SFX E   nn    fidís       éinn
SFX E   nn    fí          éinn
SFX E   inn   adar        éinn
SFX E   nn    omar        ínn
SFX E   nn    odh         ínn
SFX E   nn    mis         ínn
SFX E   nn    dís         ínn
SFX E   nn    finn        ínn
SFX E   nn    feá         ínn
SFX E   nn    feadh       ínn
SFX E   nn    fimis       ínn
SFX E   nn    fidís       ínn
SFX E   nn    fí          ínn
SFX E   nn    odar        ínn
SFX E   ínn   iteá        [^aou]ínn
SFX E   ínn   ití         [^aou]ínn
SFX E   nn    teá         aínn
SFX E   nn    tí          aínn
SFX E   ínn   iteá        [^l]oínn
SFX E   ínn   ití         [^l]oínn
SFX E   nn    teá         loínn
SFX E   nn    tí          loínn
SFX E   ínn   iteá        [^hb]uínn
SFX E   ínn   ití         [^hb]uínn
SFX E   ínn   iteá        ghuínn
SFX E   ínn   ití         ghuínn
SFX E   ínn   iteá        shuínn
SFX E   ínn   ití         shuínn
SFX E   nn    teá         bhuínn
SFX E   nn    tí          bhuínn
SFX E   nn    teá         buínn
SFX E   nn    tí          buínn

SFX C Y 20
SFX C   m     onn         aím
SFX C   0     id          aím
SFX C   m     tear        aím
SFX C   m     odh         aím
SFX C   aím   óidh        aím
SFX C   aím   óimid       aím
SFX C   aím   ófar        aím
SFX C   m     gí          aím
SFX C   0     is          aím
SFX C   m     dís         aím
SFX C   m     onn         [^a]ím
SFX C   0     id          [^a]ím
SFX C   m     tear        [^a]ím
SFX C   m     odh         [^a]ím
SFX C   ím    eoidh       [^a]ím
SFX C   ím    eoimid      [^a]ím
SFX C   ím    eofar       [^a]ím
SFX C   m     gí          [^a]ím
SFX C   0     is          [^a]ím
SFX C   m     dís         [^a]ím
