utilities/dictionaries/ga_GA-Irish.dic
admhaím/UC
aiceannaím/UC
aimridím/UC
airgeadaím/UC
airgim/UA
airginn/E
aislingim/UA
aislinginn/E
aistarraingím/UC
altaím/UC
ansmachtaím/UC
aolaim/UA
aolainn/E
aothaím/UC
argaim/UA
aslaím/UC
asúim/UA
asúinn/E
athbhreithním/UC
athbhrisim/UA
athbhrisinn/E
athchognaím/UC
athchumaim/UA
athchumainn/E
athdheimhním/UC
athfhuaimním/UC
athghlacaim/UA
athghlacainn/E
athléimim/UA
athléinn/E
athléirím/UC
athriaraim/UA
athriarainn/E
athsheolaim/UA
athsheolainn/E
athshlánaím/UC
atochraisim/UA
atochraisinn/E
atreisím/UC
balbhaím/USC
balcaim/USA
barúlaim/USA
beagaím/USC
bhaistinn/EU
bharrtheilginn/EU
bhlaisféiminn/EU
bholgainn/EU
bhrisinn/EU
bhréanainn/EU
bhuínn/EU
biathaím/USC
blaisim/USA
bochtaím/USC
borbaím/USC
borraim/USA
breáthaím/USC
broicim/USA
bróidním/USC
brúchtaim/USA
báim/USA
básaím/USC
caintím/USC
calabraím/USC
calcaim/USA
caolaím/USC
casaoidim/USA
catalaím/USC
ceansaím/USC
chaithinn/EU
chasainn/EU
chiapainn/EU
chleachtainn/EU
chlóbhuailinn/EU
chnaínn/EU
choincheapainn/EU
cholainn/EU
chomhfháiscinn/EU
chomhshóinn/EU
chornainn/EU
chreidinn/EU
chruachainn/EU
chuachainn/EU
chéadcheapainn/EU
chúlchlóinn/EU
ciaraim/USA
cinntím/USC
clampaím/USC
clingim/USA
cluimhrím/USC
clóim/USA
cneáim/USA
cnuasaím/USC
cograím/USC
coimprím/USC
coipim/USA
comhairlím/USC
comhbhruithim/USA
comhchruinním/USC
comhfhortaím/USC
comhlíonaim/USA
comhordaím/USC
comhtháthaím/USC
comóraim/USA
contráraím/USC
cosúlaím/USC
craosfholcaim/USA
creidiúnaím/USC
crithim/USA
croscheistím/USC
cráim/USA
críochnaím/USC
cuimlím/USC
cumaim/USA
cumhdaím/USC
cásaím/USC
cóimheasaim/USA
cóirím/USC
cúltortaim/USA
cúnantaím/USC
d'adhmholainn/EU
d'aischlóinn/EU
d'aisíocainn/EU
d'ardmholainn/EU
d'ataispeánainn/EU
d'athchasainn/EU
d'athfhillinn/EU
d'athleagainn/EU
d'athoilinn/EU
d'athscinninn/EU
d'athshuínn/EU
d'atógainn/EU
d'eisiachtainn/EU
d'fhaisnéisinn/E
d'fhearainn/E
d'fhiuchainn/E
d'fholeanainn/E
d'fhordhinginn/E
d'fhorleathainn/E
d'fhorscaoilinn/E
d'fhrithshuínn/E
d'iarchuirinn/EU
d'imdheargainn/EU
d'iniainn/EU
d'obainn/EU
d'éagainn/EU
dealraím/USC
dearlacaim/USA
dhearainn/EU
dhochtainn/EU
dhámhainn/EU
dhíoscainn/EU
diamhaslaím/USC
diúgaim/USA
doiciméadaím/USC
dolaim/USA
druidim/USA
déabhlóidím/USC
dícheilim/USA
díchoimisiúnaím/USC
díghrádaím/USC
díobhaim/USA
díscoirim/USA
díshamhlaím/USC
dúmhálaim/USA
eamhnaím/UC
easmailinn/E
eisfhearaim/UA
eisím/UC
fairim/USA
feallmharaím/USC
feannaim/USA
fhaomhainn/EU
fho-ghlacainn/EU
fhorghairinn/EU
fhortheilginn/EU
fhuirsinn/EU
fionnaim/USA
fiosraím/USC
foirmlím/USC
folcaim/USA
fordheargaim/USA
forleagaim/USA
formhéadaím/USC
foroinnim/USA
fothragaim/USA
freagraím/USC
frithsheolaim/USA
fuirím/USC
fásaim/USA
fíréanaím/USC
gabhaim/USA
gannaím/USC
gealaim/USA
geitim/USA
ghalstobhainn/EU
ghlacainn/EU
ghorainn/EU
ghágainn/EU
giortaím/USC
glaoim/USA
gogalaím/USC
goidim/USA
greanaim/USA
gréiscim/USA
grúdaím/USC
gíogaim/USA
iartharaím/UC
idircheapaim/UA
idirleathainn/E
imchasaim/UA
imghabhaim/UA
imphléascainn/E
impím/UC
imshuím/UA
inréimním/UC
insteallaim/UA
iompraím/UC
iomáininn/E
ionsaím/UC
ionsuím/UA
leadraím/C
leagaim/A
leibhéalainn/E
leithroinnim/A
liteagrafaim/A
locainn/E
logánaím/C
loitim/A
láim/A
láithrím/C
léiminn/E
léirmheasaim/A
macasamhlaím/SC
mairim/SA
maranáidím/SC
meallainn/E
meathaim/SA
meathlaím/SC
mheathainn/E
mhíchumainn/E
mionbhrisinn/E
mionchoigeartaím/SC
mionghearraim/SA
monaraím/SC
méaraím/SC
míchumaim/SA
míriarainn/E
móraim/SA
mótaraím/SC
niamhghlanaim/A
néalaím/C
oirinn/E
orchraím/UC
painéalaim/USA
phléinn/EU
plancaim/USA
plandaím/USC
pollaim/USA
purgaím/USC
pógaim/USA
reachtaím/C
reicinn/E
riaraim/A
roithleagaim/A
ruainn/E
réabaim/A
réamhaithrisím/C
réamhíocaim/A
ró-íocainn/E
róluchtaím/C
róstaim/A
saoraim/SA
saothraím/SC
scairtinn/E
scamhaim/A
sceanaim/A
scilliginn/E
sciollaim/A
scláraim/A
scolbainn/E
scraithim/A
scuabaim/A
scáthaím/C
seachadainn/E
searraim/SA
sheadainn/E
shladainn/E
shnoínn/E
shuibscríobhainn/E
siarchoinním/SC
siocainn/E
siolpaim/SA
sleachtaim/SA
sluafhoinsím/SC
sléachtainn/E
slíocaim/SA
smolaim/A
snapainn/E
snoím/SA
soladaím/SC
spallaim/A
spionnainn/E
spíonaim/A
sraonainn/E
sruthlaím/SC
steancaim/A
stoithinn/E
suaraím/SC
suibscríobhaim/SA
sílinn/E
síoraím/SC
taifeadaim/USA
taifím/USC
tarraingím/USC
teasdíonaim/USA
thaomainn/EU
thiomargainn/EU
thoirmiscinn/EU
thriailinn/EU
thumainn/EU
timpeallaím/USC
tochasaim/USA
toirbhrím/USC
traschuirim/USA
treisím/USC
tuaim/USA
tuilsoilsím/USC
túsaím/USC
uamaim/UA
uimhrím/UC
urghairinn/E
ábhraím/UC
éalaím/UC
íograím/UC
íonghlanaim/UA
úscainn/E
